resources/dicts/en_CA.aff
FLAG num
AM st:urinalysis ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:urinalyses
AM ts:0 al:i
AM st:uterus ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:uteri
AM st:valis ts:Ns
AM st:velum ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:vela
AM ts:0 al:veniremen
AM st:venireman ts:Ns
AM st:venturis ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:vestrymen
AM st:vestryman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:vying
AM st:villus ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:villi
AM st:vison ts:Ns's
AM st:vison ts:Ns
AM st:viscus ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:viscera
AM st:vivarium ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:vivaria
AM st:vie ts:Vd
AM st:wadis ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:wades
AM st:waitperson ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:waitpeople
AM ts:0 al:woke al:woken
AM st:walis ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:washerwomen
AM st:washerwoman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:watchmen
AM st:watchman ts:Ns
AM st:wavey ts:0
AM ts:0 al:wore al:worn
AM ts:0 al:weathermen
AM st:weatherman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:wove al:woven
AM st:webfoot ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:webfeet
AM ts:0 al:wept
AM ts:0 al:Welshmen
AM st:Welshman ts:Ns
AM st:go ts:Vd
AM st:weep ts:Vd
AM st:whiney ts:0
AM ts:0 al:wives
AM ts:0 al:would al:wouldst
AM ts:0 al:won
AM ts:0 al:wound
AM st:winey ts:0
AM ts:0 al:wost al:wot
AM ts:0 al:withdrew
AM st:withdraw ts:Vd
AM st:withhold ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:withheld
AM ts:0 al:withstood
AM st:withstand ts:Vd
AM st:wife ts:Ns
AM st:wake ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:women
AM st:woman ts:Ns
AM st:win ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:woodmen
AM st:woodman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:woodsmen
AM st:woodsman ts:Ns
AM st:wear ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:wrought
AM ts:0 al:workingmen
AM st:workingman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:workingwomen
AM st:workingwoman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:workmen
AM st:workman ts:Ns
AM st:ill ts:0
AM st:wit ts:Vd
AM st:will ts:Vd
AM st:wind ts:Vd
AM st:weave ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:wrung
AM ts:0 al:wrote
AM st:write ts:Vd
AM st:work ts:Vd
AM st:wring ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:yachtsmen
AM st:yachtsman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:yachtswomen
AM st:yachtswoman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:yardmen
AM st:yardman ts:Ns
AM st:yum ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:yeomen
AM st:yeoman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:ya
AM is:Ns
AM is:At
AM is:N's
AM is:Vd
AM is:Aness's
AM is:Vs
AM is:Ar
AM is:Nm's
AM is:Vg
AM is:Ns's
AM is:Aness is:s
AM is:Ay
AM is:Nm
AM is:Aness
AM is:'s
SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ'
WORDCHARS 0123456789'.-’
NOSUGGEST 200

# ordinal numbers
COMPOUNDMIN 1
# only in compounds: 1th, 2th, 3th
ONLYINCOMPOUND 300
# compound rules:
# 1. [0-9]*1[0-9]th (10th, 11th, 12th, 56714th, etc.)
# 2. [0-9]*[02-9](1st|2nd|3rd|[4-9]th) (21st, 22nd, 123rd, 1234th, etc.)
COMPOUNDRULE 2
COMPOUNDRULE (201)*(202)(203)
COMPOUNDRULE (201)*(204)(205)

REP 94
REP nt n't
REP alot a_lot
REP avengence a_vengeance
REP ninties 1990s
REP teached taught
REP rised rose
REP a ei
REP ei a
REP a ey
REP ey a
REP ai ie
REP ie ai
REP are air
REP are ear
REP are eir
REP air are
REP air ere
REP ere air
REP ere ear
REP ere eir
REP ear are
REP ear air
REP ear ere
REP eir are
REP eir ere
REP ch te
REP te ch
REP ch ti
REP ti ch
REP ch tu
REP tu ch
REP ch s
REP s ch
REP ch k
REP k ch
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP gh f
REP f gh
REP i igh
REP igh i
REP i uy
REP uy i
REP i ee
REP ee i
REP j di
REP di j
REP j gg
REP gg j
REP j ge
REP ge j
REP s ti
REP ti s
REP s ci
REP ci s
REP k cc
REP cc k
REP k qu
REP qu k
REP kw qu
REP o eau
REP eau o
REP o ew
REP ew o
REP oo ew
REP ew oo
REP ew ui
REP ui ew
REP oo ui
REP ui oo
REP ew u
REP u ew
REP oo u
REP u oo
REP u oe
REP oe u
REP u ieu
REP ieu u
REP ue ew
REP ew ue
REP uff ough
REP oo ieu
REP ieu oo
REP ier ear
REP ear ier
REP ear air
REP air ear
REP w qu
REP qu w
REP z ss
REP ss z
REP shun tion
REP shun sion
REP shun cion
SFX 123 N 1
SFX 123 i 0 i 1820
SFX 50 N 1
SFX 50 0 lest . 1821
SFX 137 N 1
SFX 137 0 en . 1820
SFX 124 N 1
SFX 124 i 's i 1822
SFX 72 N 1
SFX 72 0 gest . 1821
SFX 148 N 1
SFX 148 0 Ted . 1823
SFX 34 N 1
SFX 34 y iness's y 1824
SFX 65 N 1
SFX 65 0 ded . 1823
SFX 41 N 1
SFX 41 0 led . 1823
SFX 112 N 1
SFX 112 0 zes . 1825
SFX 69 N 1
SFX 69 e den e 1823
SFX 13 N 1
SFX 13 0 ted . 1823
SFX 67 N 1
SFX 67 f ves f 1820
SFX 52 N 1
SFX 52 e ten e 1823
SFX 63 N 1
SFX 63 0 med . 1823
SFX 136 N 1
SFX 136 e ier e 1826
SFX 47 N 1
SFX 47 0 n . 1823
SFX 4 N 1
SFX 4 0 es . 1820
SFX 145 N 1
SFX 145 0 im's . 1827
SFX 54 N 1
SFX 54 0 ging . 1828
SFX 62 N 1
SFX 62 0 en . 1823
SFX 149 N 1
SFX 149 0 Ting . 1828
SFX 115 N 1
SFX 115 0 per . 1826
SFX 55 N 1
SFX 55 0 bing . 1828
SFX 9 N 1
SFX 9 e ing e 1828
SFX 135 N 1
SFX 135 0 ses's . 1829
SFX 33 N 1
SFX 33 0 ping . 1828
SFX 25 N 1
SFX 25 0 nesses . 1830
SFX 103 N 1
SFX 103 0 best . 1821
SFX 36 N 1
SFX 36 y ily y 1831
SFX 31 N 1
SFX 31 0 ally . 1831
SFX 116 N 1
SFX 116 0 pest . 1821
SFX 98 N 1
SFX 98 e ce e 1820
SFX 94 N 1
SFX 94 s es s 1820
SFX 46 N 1
SFX 46 x ces x 1820
SFX 44 N 1
SFX 44 0 king . 1828
SFX 80 N 1
SFX 80 y inesses y 1830
SFX 27 N 1
SFX 27 y ies y 1825
SFX 7 N 1
SFX 7 0 s . 1825
SFX 28 N 1
SFX 28 0 s's . 1829
SFX 6 N 1
SFX 6 0 ing . 1828
SFX 97 N 1
SFX 97 0 fest . 1821
SFX 75 N 1
SFX 75 0 ren . 1820
SFX 109 N 1
SFX 109 0 test . 1821
SFX 99 N 1
SFX 99 0 ta . 1820
SFX 39 N 1
SFX 39 0 ses . 1825
SFX 11 N 1
SFX 11 0 es . 1825
SFX 134 N 1
SFX 134 o id o 1823
SFX 90 N 1
SFX 90 0 fed . 1823
SFX 83 N 1
SFX 83 0 im . 1832
SFX 60 N 1
SFX 60 0 ned . 1823
SFX 141 N 1
SFX 141 0 ved . 1823
SFX 70 N 1
SFX 70 0 den . 1823
SFX 85 N 1
SFX 85 y ies's y 1829
SFX 119 N 1
SFX 119 y id y 1823
SFX 68 N 1
SFX 68 d t d 1823
SFX 95 N 1
SFX 95 0 allier . 1826
SFX 21 N 1
SFX 21 0 st . 1821
SFX 30 N 1
SFX 30 y iest y 1821
SFX 110 N 1
SFX 110 0 zes . 1820
SFX 91 N 1
SFX 91 0 fing . 1828
SFX 128 N 1
SFX 128 0 r . 1820
SFX 92 N 1
SFX 92 0 rer . 1826
SFX 14 N 1
SFX 14 0 ting . 1828
SFX 106 N 1
SFX 106 l t l 1823
SFX 59 N 1
SFX 59 0 i . 1820
SFX 20 N 1
SFX 20 0 r . 1826
SFX 12 N 1
SFX 12 0 ses . 1820
SFX 18 N 1
SFX 18 0 ness . 1833
SFX 84 N 1
SFX 84 e i e 1820
SFX 10 N 1
SFX 10 0 ly . 1831
SFX 76 N 1
SFX 76 0 e's . 1829
SFX 139 N 1
SFX 139 n 0 n 1820
SFX 53 N 1
SFX 53 0 ged . 1823
SFX 24 N 1
SFX 24 0 est . 1821
SFX 79 N 1
SFX 79 0 t . 1823
SFX 131 N 1
SFX 131 e t e 1823
SFX 102 N 1
SFX 102 0 ber . 1826
SFX 17 N 1
SFX 17 y ies y 1820
SFX 37 N 1
SFX 37 0 e . 1820
SFX 126 N 1
SFX 126 a or a 1820
SFX 146 N 1
SFX 146 y in y 1823
SFX 74 N 1
SFX 74 0 ser . 1826
SFX 150 N 1
SFX 150 t st t 1823
SFX 40 N 1
SFX 40 0 sing . 1828
SFX 121 N 1
SFX 121 e ia e 1820
SFX 3 N 1
SFX 3 0 s . 1820
SFX 93 N 1
SFX 93 o i's o 1829
SFX 61 N 1
SFX 61 0 ning . 1828
SFX 32 N 1
SFX 32 0 ped . 1823
SFX 105 N 1
SFX 105 0 nest . 1821
SFX 132 N 1
SFX 132 0 a . 1820
SFX 29 N 1
SFX 29 y ier y 1826
SFX 140 N 1
SFX 140 0 rest . 1821
SFX 56 N 1
SFX 56 0 der . 1826
SFX 82 N 1
SFX 82 0 st . 1823
SFX 49 N 1
SFX 49 0 ler . 1826
SFX 45 N 1
SFX 45 o i o 1820
SFX 108 N 1
SFX 108 0 thest . 1821
SFX 81 N 1
SFX 81 0 ter . 1826
SFX 58 N 1
SFX 58 0 x . 1820
SFX 23 N 1
SFX 23 0 er . 1826
SFX 48 N 1
SFX 48 s ntes s 1820
SFX 89 N 1
SFX 89 x ges x 1820
SFX 118 N 1
SFX 118 y own y 1823
SFX 51 N 1
SFX 51 e 0 e 1823
SFX 127 N 1
SFX 127 a ur a 1820
SFX 86 N 1
SFX 86 0 lier . 1826
SFX 66 N 1
SFX 66 0 ding . 1828
SFX 73 N 1
SFX 73 0 bed . 1823
SFX 16 N 1
SFX 16 0 ring . 1828
SFX 57 N 1
SFX 57 0 dest . 1821
SFX 143 N 1
SFX 143 e iest e 1821
SFX 138 N 1
SFX 138 0 es's . 1829
SFX 15 N 1
SFX 15 0 red . 1823
SFX 122 N 1
SFX 122 e ia's e 1829
SFX 111 N 1
SFX 111 0 zed . 1823
SFX 64 N 1
SFX 64 0 ming . 1828
SFX 1 N 1
SFX 1 0 's . 1834
SFX 133 N 1
SFX 133 0 t . 1820
SFX 78 N 1
SFX 78 0 mest . 1821
SFX 87 N 1
SFX 87 0 liest . 1821
SFX 142 N 1
SFX 142 0 ving . 1828
SFX 77 N 1
SFX 77 0 mer . 1826
SFX 125 N 1
SFX 125 a i a 1820
SFX 104 N 1
SFX 104 0 ner . 1826
SFX 2 N 1
SFX 2 0 's . 1822
SFX 120 N 1
SFX 120 o ines o 1820
SFX 117 N 1
SFX 117 y ew y 1823
SFX 35 N 1
SFX 35 y iness y 1833
SFX 129 N 1
SFX 129 0 er . 1820
SFX 26 N 1
SFX 26 y ied y 1823
SFX 19 N 1
SFX 19 0 ness's . 1824
SFX 101 N 1
SFX 101 0 th . 1823
SFX 8 N 1
SFX 8 0 d . 1823
SFX 43 N 1
SFX 43 0 ked . 1823
SFX 22 N 1
SFX 22 e y e 1831
SFX 114 N 1
SFX 114 e d e 1823
SFX 38 N 1
SFX 38 0 sed . 1823
SFX 147 N 1
SFX 147 0 ist . 1821
SFX 5 N 1
SFX 5 0 ed . 1823
SFX 107 N 1
SFX 107 0 ther . 1826
SFX 130 N 1
SFX 130 a e a 1820
SFX 96 N 1
SFX 96 0 fer . 1826
SFX 88 N 1
SFX 88 s des s 1820

AF 2,3 # 1
AF 1 # 3
AF 3,5,6,7 # 5
AF 8,7,9 # 6
AF 12 # 9
AF 7,13,14 # 12
AF 4,2,5,11,6 # 22
AF 2,3,5,6,7 # 23
AF 2,3,8,7,9 # 28
AF 6,26,27 # 31
AF 3,28 # 32
AF 31 # 39
AF 2,3,32,33,7 # 48
AF 29,30,36,34,35 # 51
AF 23,24,10,18,19,2,3,5,6,7 # 53
AF 41,42,7 # 62
AF 2,3,43,44,7 # 64
AF 2,3,41,42,7 # 66
AF 2,3,28,31 # 70
AF 38,39,40 # 80
AF 4,2,48 # 81
AF 49,50,10,18,19 # 85
AF 2,3,53,54,7 # 92
AF 10,18,19,20,21,8,7,9 # 104
AF 2,3,7,13,14 # 109
AF 2,3,65,66,7 # 113
AF 62,6,7 # 116
AF 2,67 # 120
AF 2,3,28 # 130
AF 2,3,70,66,7 # 131
AF 2,3,73,55,7 # 136
AF 34,35 # 140
AF 73,55,7 # 145
AF 75,2 # 155
AF 2,3,63,64,7 # 160
AF 18,19,29,30,36,80,34,35,6,26,27 # 175
AF 11,6,4,2 # 184
AF 2,46 # 186
AF 83,2,3 # 188
AF 2,89 # 203
AF 2,3,90,91,7 # 205
AF 2,94 # 230
AF 95,31 # 231
AF 23,96,97 # 239
AF 15,16,7,2,3,92 # 243
AF 2,3,98,8,6,7 # 246
AF 11,6,100,82,101,3 # 257
AF 102,103,10,18,19,2,3,7 # 262
AF 2,3,47,7,9 # 264
AF 107,108 # 285
AF 23,24,18,25,19,2,3,5,6,7 # 286
AF 10,18,19,81,109,2,3,7,13,14 # 294
AF 115,116,2,3,32,33,7 # 297
AF 115,2,3,32,33,7 # 298
AF 70,66,7 # 300
AF 111,112,113,2,110 # 308
AF 6,7,119 # 314
AF 7,9,52 # 319
AF 102,103,10,18,19 # 324
AF 10,77,78,18,19 # 326
AF 102,2,3,73,55,7 # 329
AF 115,116 # 342
AF 2,3,7,69,51,9 # 343
AF 12,38,39,40 # 344
AF 2,85,17 # 347
AF 4,2,120 # 352
AF 2,3,6,7,119 # 356
AF 2,121,122 # 357
AF 11,4,2,88 # 362
AF 2,123,124 # 367
AF 2,3,7,69,9 # 369
AF 83,2 # 370
AF 2,3,125 # 371
AF 2,126,127 # 375
AF 128,2 # 376
AF 2,5,6,43,44 # 378
AF 23,24,10,18,19,46 # 383
AF 129,2 # 388
AF 2,3,86,87,10,18,25,19,20,21,8,7,9 # 389
AF 7,9,131 # 399
AF 2,60,61,7,86,87,10 # 404
AF 132,2 # 406
AF 2,3,133 # 409
AF 2,82 # 410
AF 11,6,100,134 # 418
AF 45 # 421
AF 137,2 # 427
AF 6,117,27,118 # 446
AF 137,4,2 # 448
AF 45,93 # 449
AF 15,16,7,23,2,3 # 450
AF 4,2,3,5,11,6 # 457
AF 49,50,10 # 459
AF 2,3,139 # 468
AF 37,76,2 # 473
AF 140,2,3,5,6,7 # 478
AF 56,57,18,19,7 # 481
AF 13,14 # 482
AF 2,3,7,141,142 # 487
AF 136,143,22,2,3,8,7,9 # 490
AF 99 # 497
